Utah statutes.
10-3-805.   Administrative powers in cities of the second class.

The administrative powers, authority and duties in cities of the second class shall be divided into five departments which shall be:

(1)  Department of Public Affairs and Finances.

(2)  Department of Water and Waterworks.

(3)  Department of Public Safety.

(4)  Department of Streets and Public Improvements.

(5)  Department of Parks and Public Property.

